Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4510.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 19c. (1) For a system in which the State of Michigan
Investment Board created under Executive Reorganization Order No.
2018-5, MCL 38.1176, is the investment fiduciary, the investment
fiduciary may invest in cryptocurrency that has a market
capitalization of at least $250,000,000,000.00 averaged over the
previous calendar year. If an investment fiduciary described in
this subsection invests in cryptocurrency as allowed under this
subsection, and if, after the investment, the market capitalization
is less than $250,000,000,000.00, the investment fiduciary is not
DAW H01873'25 (H-2) pvmwkg


required to sell the cryptocurrency. An investment fiduciary
described in this subsection shall not invest more than 5% of a
system's assets in cryptocurrency. Any digital asset held directly
by a system described in this subsection must be held in the form
of an exchange-traded product issued by a registered investment
company.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Cryptocurrency" means digital currency in which
encryption techniques are used to regulate the generation of units
of currency and verify the transfer of funds, and that operates
independently of a central bank.
(b) "Digital asset" means virtual currency, cryptocurrencies,
natively electronic assets, including stablecoins and non-fungible
tokens, and other digital-only assets that confer economic,
proprietary, or access rights or powers.
(c) "Exchange-traded product" means any financial instrument
that is approved by the United States Commodities Futures Trading
Commission or the Securities and Exchange Commission that is traded
on a United States regulated exchange and derives its value from an
underlying pool of assets, including, but not limited to, stocks,
bonds, commodities, and indexes.
Final Page
DAW H01873'25 (H-2) pvmwkg